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DI3R3-01

DTC P0500/42 | Vehicle Speed Sensor Malfunction
(No.1 Speed Sensor)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The speed sensor detects the rotation speed of the transmission output shaft and sends signals to the En-
gineandECTECU (2UZ -FE, 1FZ-FE)orECTECU( 1HZ, 1HD-T, 1HD-FTE). The EngineandECT ECU
(2QUZ-FE, 1FZ-FE)orECTECU( 1HZ, 1HD-T, 1HD-FTE) determinesthe vehicle speed based onthese
signals. An AC voltage is generated in the vehicle speed sensor coil as the rotor mounted on the output shaft

rotates, andthis voltageis senttothe Engineand ECT ECU (2UZ -FE,1FZ-FE)orECTECU( 1HZ, 1HD-T,

1HD-FTE).

4 - pulse 4 - pulse

o

No.1 Speed Sensor Combination Meter Engine and ECT ECU

P22487

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

All conditions below are detected 500 times or more continu-
ously.

(2 trip detection logic)

(a) NosignalfromNo. 1 speedsensorisinputto Engineand
ECT ECU or ECT ECU while 72 pulueses of No.2 speed sen-

sorsignalis sent (Transfer shiftlever otherthan L position). *OpenorshortinNo. 1 speedsensor circuit
(b) NosignalfromNo. 1 speedsensorisinputto Engineand *No.1 speedsensor

PO500/42 | ECTECUOrECTECUwhile 180 puleses ofNo.2speed sen- *Engineand ECTECU (2UZ  -FE, 1FZ-FE)
sor signal is sent (Transfer shift lever L position). *ECTECU( 1HZ, 1HD-T, 1HD-FTE)
(c) Vehicle speed: 5 km/h (3 mph) or more for atleast 4 se- * Automatictransmission assembly
conds.

(d) Neutral start switch: OFF (Other than P or N range)
(e) T/R: Other than N position

Clutch or brake slips or gear broken

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM6 16E)



DI-120
DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A442F)

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

Read freeze frame data using hand-held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ning or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air-fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time of the malfunction.

1 Connect hand-held tester and read value of vehicle speed value.

PREPARATION:
(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Start the engine and the hand-held tester main switch ON.
CHECK:
Drive the vehicle and read vehicle speed value.
OK:
Vehicle speed matches tester speed value

ECU (See page IN-35).

NG> Check and replace Engine and ECT ECU or ECT

@

2 [ Check speedometer circuit (See page BE-2).

NG> Repair or replace speedometer circuit.
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Check resistance between terminal SPD of Engine and ECT ECU or terminal SP1
of ECT ECU connector and body ground.

ON
)
SPD
2UZ-FE
Aulagant]
—|:||——7—|:|— '
O\ @

I W)

1F£—FE SPD

L[

LIl LA

e

1HD-FTE

+)

)
4

()

D01655
P24206

Q11280
D03253

D03310

LAND CRUISER (W/G)

(RM616E)

PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the glove compartment door

(See page BO-127).

Disconnect the cruise control ECU connector.

Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU or
ECT ECU.

(d) Shift the shift lever to neutral.
(e) Jack up the rear wheel on one side.

(f)  Turn ignition switch ON.
CHECK:

Check voltage between terminals SPD of the Engine and ECT
ECUorterminal SP 1 ofthe ECT ECU connectorand body
groune when the wheel is turned slowly.
OK:
Voltage is generated intermittently

4-6V

(b)
(©

ON

Turn the wheel AT7809
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-

Check and repair harness and connector be-
tween combination meter and Engine and ECT
ECU or ECT ECU (See page IN-35).

OK

Check and replace Engine and ECT ECU or
ECT ECU (See page IN-35).
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